Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska44-6404
Motor vehicle, defined.

Motor vehicle shall mean a motor vehicle as defined in section 60-501.

Laws 1986, LB 573, § 3;

R.S.1943, (1988), § 60-573;

Laws 1994, LB 1074, § 4.